Iowa, session 2025-2026, HSB532.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 5083YC (4) 91 mb/jh H.F. _____ Section 1. Section 262.9, Code 2026, is amended by adding 1 the following new subsection: 2 NEW SUBSECTION . 39A. a. Adopt a policy requiring that not 3 less than eighty percent of the students who are accepted at 4 the college of law at the state university of Iowa be residents 5 of Iowa or persons who were, prior to applying to the college 6 of law, enrolled in an eligible postsecondary institution as 7 defined in section 261E.2. 8 b. Adopt a policy that gives priority for admission to 9 residents of Iowa who apply for the college of law at the state 10 university of Iowa. 11 c. Adopt a policy requiring an application for admission to 12 the college of law at the state university of Iowa to include 13 an applicant attestation that includes all of the following: 14 (1) I was born in Iowa or graduated from an Iowa high 15 school. 16 (2) I have family members or in-laws who reside in Iowa, or 17 I graduated from a public or private university, a college, or 18 a community college located in Iowa. 19 (3) None of the above apply to me; however, I am interested 20 in practicing law in Iowa after graduation. 21 (4) None of the above apply to me; however, I am interested 22 in attending the college of law at the state university of 23 Iowa. 24 d. (1) Require the state university of Iowa to submit an 25 annual report to the general assembly that contains, for the 26 immediately preceding calendar year, all of the following: 27 (a) The number of applicants who are residents of Iowa who 28 were accepted to the college of law. 29 (b) The number of applicants who are residents of Iowa who 30 were not accepted to the college of law, and a brief statement 31 related to why each applicant was denied. 32 (2) Personal information regarding an applicant in an 33 annual report submitted pursuant to this paragraph shall 34 be kept confidential as required under the federal Family 35 -1- LSB 5083YC (4) 91 mb/jh 1/ 3 H.F. _____ Educational Rights and Privacy Act, 20 U.S.C. Â§1252g, and in 1 the same manner as personal information in student records 2 maintained, created, collected, or assembled by or for a school 3 corporation or education institution in accordance with section 4 22.7, subsection 1. 5 e. For purposes of this subsection, âresident of Iowaâ means 6 any of the following: 7 (1) An individual who graduated from an Iowa high school. 8 (2) An individual who has lived in Iowa for at least four 9 consecutive years immediately preceding the date the individual 10 begins classes at the college of law at the state university 11 of Iowa. 12